Oklahoma, session 2026, SB846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3260 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Stop DEI


Act”.


B. For the purposes of this section:

Req. No. 720 Page 1


1. “Constrain” means failure during any semester of an academic


year to provide sufficient open seats in alternative courses for a


student to complete or progress toward completion of a degree or


program requirements;


2. “DEI-CRT” means diversity, equity, inclusion, and critical


race theory;


3. “DEI-CRT related course” means any course with a


description, course overview, course objectives, proposed student


learning outcomes, written examinations, or written or oral


assignments for which the student will receive a grade that includes


DEI-CRT related content;


4. “DEI-CRT related content” means content that does one or


more of the following:


a. relates any of the following topics to contemporary


American society: critical theory, whiteness,


systemic racism, institutional racism, anti-racism,


microaggressions, systemic bias, implicit bias,


unconscious bias, intersectionality, gender identity,


social justice, cultural competence, allyship, race-


based reparations, or race-based privilege, race- or


gender-based diversity, race- or gender-based equity,


or race- or gender-based inclusion,


b. promotes the idea that racially neutral or color-blind


laws, policies, or institutions perpetuate oppression,

Req. No. 720 Page 2


injustice, race-based privilege including white


supremacy or white privilege, or inequity by failing


to actively differentiate on the basis of race, sex,


or gender,


c. promotes the differential treatment of any individual


or groups of individuals based on race or ethnicity in


contemporary American society,


d. promotes the idea that a student is biased on account


of his or her race or sex, or


e. does not include identifying and discussing historical


movements, ideologies, or instances of racial hatred


or discrimination including, but not limited to,


slavery, Indian tribe removal, the Holocaust, or


Japanese-American internment;


5. “DEI-CRT practices” means:


a. any requirement or guidance that a course instructor


include or curate materials on the basis of the race,


sex, or gender identity of an author or authors, or


b. participating in any workshop, training, seminar, or


professional development on any DEI-CRT related


content.


DEI-CRT practices does not mean any programming explicitly required


by and limited to an institution of higher education’s obligations


to comply with: Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, as

Req. No. 720 Page 3


amended; the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended; the Age


Discrimination in Employment Act, as amended; Title VI of the Civil


Rights Act of 1964; or an applicable court order; and


6. “Institution of higher education” means an institution of


higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher


Education.


C. The governing board of each institution of higher education


shall establish curricula and designate courses at the institution


in a manner that does not constrain or require students to enroll in


a DEI-CRT related education, major, minor, or certificate


requirement, except as provided for in subsection E of this section.


D. An institution of higher education or any employee,


appointee, or committee acting on behalf thereof may not require,


solicit, or incentivize faculty to apply or participate in DEI-CRT


practices or include DEI-CRT related content in any course as a


condition of approval, designation, or listing as part of any


academic degree program including general education, major, minor,


or certificate requirements or as a condition of consideration in


any faculty member’s performance assessment, promotion, tenure,


salary adjustment, or any other incentive, except as provided for in


subsection E of this section.


E. Academic degree program requirements of any major, minor,


certificate, or department with a title that clearly establishes its


course of study as primarily focused on racial, ethnic, or gender

Req. No. 720 Page 4


studies may be exempted in writing by the governing board of the


institution of higher education from the prohibitions of subsections


C and D of this section, subject to the following:


1. A student may not be constrained or required to enroll in


any such program, department, or course to satisfy the requirements


of any other academic degree program including general education


requirements or any other major, minor, or certificate requirements;


2. Courses offered or listed under such programs shall satisfy


the academic degree program requirements of the respective


departments, majors, minors, or certificates only and shall not be


used to satisfy degree requirements for general education or other


major, minor, or certificate requirements beyond satisfying


university credit-hour graduation requirements; and


3. The title of any currently established department, major,


minor, or certificate program shall not be altered or replaced to


establish an emphasis on racial, ethnic, or gender studies.


F. 1. An alleged violation of the provisions of this section


shall be submitted to the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher


Education on a form prescribed by the State Regents.


2. The State Regents shall adopt a policy providing for the


investigation of alleged violations submitted pursuant to paragraph


of this subsection. The policy shall include due process


procedures. An institution of higher education found to be in


violation of the provisions of this section shall be ineligible to

Req. No. 720 Page 5


receive funding allocations from the Oklahoma State Regents for


Higher Education for the following fiscal years.


3. The State Regents shall submit a report by December 31,


2026, and each December 31 thereafter to the Governor, the President


Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of


Representatives, and the chairs of the committees with


responsibility over appropriations in both houses of the Legislature


detailing the alleged violations submitted pursuant to paragraph 1


of this subsection and the findings of investigations conducted


pursuant to paragraph 2 of this subsection.


G. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the


academic freedom of any individual institution of higher education’s


faculty to direct the instruction within his or her own class, nor


limit the free discussion of ideas in a classroom setting.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-720 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:32 AM







Req. No. 720 Page 6